Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.395

Continuing authority for investments.

Any investment by a bank other than a loan, if legal and authorized when made, may continue to be held by the bank notwithstanding a change in circumstances or change in the law.

[ 1986 c 279 s 16. Formerly RCW 30.04.395.]